Ohio, session 136, SB39.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Ohio:
S 1. That section 4113.13 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows:
ECTION
Sec. 4113.13. (A) The director of commerce, in consultation with the director of veterans
services, shall create a veterans' benefits and services poster. The director of commerce shall include
information about the following topics in the poster:
(1) Programs provided by the department of veterans services, including the department's
contact and web site information;
(2) The United States department of veterans affairs veterans crisis line, including contact
information for the crisis line;
(3) Substance abuse and mental health treatment programs available to veterans;
(4) Educational, workforce, and training resources available to veterans;
(5) Tax benefits and exemptions available to veterans;
(6) The availability of an armed forces designation on an Ohio driver's license or
identification card;
(7) Eligibility for unemployment benefits under Chapter 4141. of the Revised Code and
federal unemployment compensation law;
(8) Legal services available to veterans;
(9) The availability of any other benefit or service relevant to veterans that the directors
determine should be included on the poster.
(B) An employer employing employees in this state may display a copy of the poster created
under division (A) of this section on the employer's premises in a conspicuous place that is
frequented by the largest number of employees and to which all employees have access. The director
of commerce shall provide an employer with a copy of the poster free of charge at the request of the
employer.

S. B. No. 39 136th G.A.
Speaker ___________________ of the House of Representatives.
President ___________________ of the Senate.
Passed ________________________, 20____
Approved ________________________, 20____
Governor.

S. B. No. 39 136th G.A.
The section numbering of law of a general and permanent nature is
complete and in conformity with the Revised Code.
Director, Legislative Service Commission.
Filed in the office of the Secretary of State at Columbus, Ohio, on the ____
day of ___________, A. D. 20____.
Secretary of State.
File No. _________ Effective Date ___________________